Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-107 Goods to be severed from
realty: recording. (1) A contract for the sale of minerals or the like
(including oil and gas) or a structure or its materials to be removed from
realty is a contract for the sale of goods within this article if they are to
be severed by the seller but until severance a purported present sale thereof
which is not effective as a transfer of an interest in land is effective only
as a contract to sell.

(2) A contract for the sale apart from the
land of growing crops or other things attached to realty and capable of
severance without material harm thereto but not described in subsection (1) or
of timber to be cut is a contract for the sale of goods within this article
whether the subject matter is to be severed by the buyer or by the seller even
though it forms part of the realty at the time of contracting, and the parties
can by identification effect a present sale before severance.

(3) The provisions of this section are subject
to any third party rights provided by the law relating to realty records, and
the contract for sale may be executed and recorded as a document transferring
an interest in land and shall then constitute notice to third parties of the
buyer's rights under the contract for sale. [L 1965, c 208, §2-107; HRS
§490:2-107; am L 1978, c 155, §1(4)]

Case Notes

Cited: 841 F. Supp. 986.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next